Tennessee, session 114, SB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-68-105(b), is amended by deleting
the first sentence and substituting:
Each law enforcement agency shall negotiate the terms of a memorandum of
agreement between the law enforcement agency and the appropriate federal official
authorizing the law enforcement agency to participate in the 287(g) program under 8
U.S.C. § 1357(g), concerning the enforcement of federal immigration laws, and
authorizing law enforcement officers of the agency to participate in the warrant service
officer program under the bureau of immigration and customs enforcement of the United
States department of homeland security.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1364
001443
- 1 -